server/LibreOfficePortable/App/libreoffice/share/extensions/dict-es/es_US.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX Ì Y 388
SFX Ì abar ábala abar
SFX Ì abar ábalas abar
SFX Ì abar ábalo abar
SFX Ì abar ábalos abar
SFX Ì r la r
SFX Ì r las r
SFX Ì r lo r
SFX Ì r los r
SFX Ì r dla r
SFX Ì r dlas r
SFX Ì r dlo r
SFX Ì r dlos r
SFX Ì acar ácala acar
SFX Ì acar ácalas acar
SFX Ì acar ácalo acar
SFX Ì acar ácalos acar
SFX Ì achar áchala achar
SFX Ì achar áchalas achar
SFX Ì achar áchalo achar
SFX Ì achar áchalos achar
SFX Ì adir ádela adir
SFX Ì adir ádelas adir
SFX Ì adir ádelo adir
SFX Ì adir ádelos adir
SFX Ì agar ágala agar
SFX Ì agar ágalas agar
SFX Ì agar ágalo agar
SFX Ì agar ágalos agar
SFX Ì ajar ájala ajar
SFX Ì ajar ájalas ajar
SFX Ì ajar ájalo ajar
SFX Ì ajar ájalos ajar
SFX Ì alar álala alar
SFX Ì alar álalas alar
SFX Ì alar álalo alar
SFX Ì alar álalos alar
SFX Ì amar ámala amar
SFX Ì amar ámalas amar
SFX Ì amar ámalo amar
SFX Ì amar ámalos amar
SFX Ì ambiar ámbiala ambiar
SFX Ì ambiar ámbialas ambiar
SFX Ì ambiar ámbialo ambiar
SFX Ì ambiar ámbialos ambiar
SFX Ì andar ándala andar
SFX Ì andar ándalas andar
SFX Ì andar ándalo andar
SFX Ì andar ándalos andar
SFX Ì ansar ánsala ansar
SFX Ì ansar ánsalas ansar
SFX Ì ansar ánsalo ansar
SFX Ì ansar ánsalos ansar
SFX Ì antar ántala antar
SFX Ì antar ántalas antar
SFX Ì antar ántalo antar
SFX Ì antar ántalos antar
SFX Ì anzar ánzala anzar
SFX Ì anzar ánzalas anzar
SFX Ì anzar ánzalo anzar
SFX Ì anzar ánzalos anzar
SFX Ì añar áñala añar
SFX Ì añar áñalas añar
SFX Ì añar áñalo añar
SFX Ì añar áñalos añar
SFX Ì apar ápala apar
SFX Ì apar ápalas apar
SFX Ì apar ápalo apar
SFX Ì apar ápalos apar
SFX Ì arar árala arar
SFX Ì arar áralas arar
SFX Ì arar áralo arar
SFX Ì arar áralos arar
SFX Ì arcar árcala arcar
SFX Ì arcar árcalas arcar
SFX Ì arcar árcalo arcar
SFX Ì arcar árcalos arcar
SFX Ì arcir árcela arcir
SFX Ì arcir árcelas arcir
SFX Ì arcir árcelo arcir
SFX Ì arcir árcelos arcir
SFX Ì ardar árdala ardar
SFX Ì ardar árdalas ardar
SFX Ì ardar árdalo ardar
SFX Ì ardar árdalos ardar
SFX Ì argar árgala argar
SFX Ì argar árgalas argar
SFX Ì argar árgalo argar
SFX Ì argar árgalos argar
SFX Ì arrar árrala arrar
SFX Ì arrar árralas arrar
SFX Ì arrar árralo arrar
SFX Ì arrar árralos arrar
SFX Ì artar ártala artar
SFX Ì artar ártalas artar
SFX Ì artar ártalo artar
SFX Ì artar ártalos artar
SFX Ì artir ártela artir
SFX Ì artir ártelas artir
SFX Ì artir ártelo artir
SFX Ì artir ártelos artir
SFX Ì asar ásala asar
SFX Ì asar ásalas asar
SFX Ì asar ásalo asar
SFX Ì asar ásalos asar
SFX Ì astar ástala astar
SFX Ì astar ástalas astar
SFX Ì astar ástalo astar
SFX Ì astar ástalos astar
SFX Ì astrar ástrala astrar
SFX Ì astrar ástralas astrar
SFX Ì astrar ástralo astrar
SFX Ì astrar ástralos astrar
SFX Ì atar átala atar
SFX Ì atar átalas atar
SFX Ì atar átalo atar
SFX Ì atar átalos atar
SFX Ì atir átela atir
SFX Ì atir átelas atir
SFX Ì atir átelo atir
SFX Ì atir átelos atir
SFX Ì avar ávala avar
SFX Ì avar ávalas avar
SFX Ì avar ávalo avar
SFX Ì avar ávalos avar
SFX Ì azar ázala azar
SFX Ì azar ázalas azar
SFX Ì azar ázalo azar
SFX Ì azar ázalos azar
SFX Ì ear éala ear
SFX Ì ear éalas ear
SFX Ì ear éalo ear
SFX Ì ear éalos ear
SFX Ì eber ébela eber
SFX Ì eber ébelas eber
SFX Ì eber ébelo eber
SFX Ì eber ébelos eber
SFX Ì echar échala echar
SFX Ì echar échalas echar
SFX Ì echar échalo echar
SFX Ì echar échalos echar
SFX Ì eer éela eer
SFX Ì eer éelas eer
SFX Ì eer éelo eer
SFX Ì eer éelos eer
SFX Ì egar égala egar
SFX Ì egar égalas egar
SFX Ì egar égalo egar
SFX Ì egar égalos egar
SFX Ì ejar éjala ejar
SFX Ì ejar éjalas ejar
SFX Ì ejar éjalo ejar
SFX Ì ejar éjalos ejar
SFX Ì elar élala elar
SFX Ì elar élalas elar
SFX Ì elar élalo elar
SFX Ì elar élalos elar
SFX Ì emar émala emar
SFX Ì emar émalas emar
SFX Ì emar émalo emar
SFX Ì emar émalos emar
SFX Ì enar énala enar
SFX Ì enar énalas enar
SFX Ì enar énalo enar
SFX Ì enar énalos enar
SFX Ì ender éndela ender
SFX Ì ender éndelas ender
SFX Ì ender éndelo ender
SFX Ì ender éndelos ender
SFX Ì entar éntala entar
SFX Ì entar éntalas entar
SFX Ì entar éntalo entar
SFX Ì entar éntalos entar
SFX Ì eptar éptala eptar
SFX Ì eptar éptalas eptar
SFX Ì eptar éptalo eptar
SFX Ì eptar éptalos eptar
SFX Ì erar érala erar
SFX Ì erar éralas erar
SFX Ì erar éralo erar
SFX Ì erar éralos erar
SFX Ì ervar érvala ervar
SFX Ì ervar érvalas ervar
SFX Ì ervar érvalo ervar
SFX Ì ervar érvalos ervar
SFX Ì esar ésala esar
SFX Ì esar ésalas esar
SFX Ì esar ésalo esar
SFX Ì esar ésalos esar
SFX Ì escar éscala escar
SFX Ì escar éscalas escar
SFX Ì escar éscalo escar
SFX Ì escar éscalos escar
SFX Ì estar éstala estar
SFX Ì estar éstalas estar
SFX Ì estar éstalo estar
SFX Ì estar éstalos estar
SFX Ì etar étala etar
SFX Ì etar étalas etar
SFX Ì etar étalo etar
SFX Ì etar étalos etar
SFX Ì eter étela eter
SFX Ì eter ételas eter
SFX Ì eter ételo eter
SFX Ì eter ételos eter
SFX Ì evar évala evar
SFX Ì evar évalas evar
SFX Ì evar évalo evar
SFX Ì evar évalos evar
SFX Ì icar ícala icar
SFX Ì icar ícalas icar
SFX Ì icar ícalo icar
SFX Ì icar ícalos icar
SFX Ì idar ídala idar
SFX Ì idar ídalas idar
SFX Ì idar ídalo idar
SFX Ì idar ídalos idar
SFX Ì idir ídela idir
SFX Ì idir ídelas idir
SFX Ì idir ídelo idir
SFX Ì idir ídelos idir
SFX Ì igar ígala igar
SFX Ì igar ígalas igar
SFX Ì igar ígalo igar
SFX Ì igar ígalos igar
SFX Ì iguar íguala iguar
SFX Ì iguar ígualas iguar
SFX Ì iguar ígualo iguar
SFX Ì iguar ígualos iguar
SFX Ì imir ímela imir
SFX Ì imir ímelas imir
SFX Ì imir ímelo imir
SFX Ì imir ímelos imir
SFX Ì inar ínala inar
SFX Ì inar ínalas inar
SFX Ì inar ínalo inar
SFX Ì inar ínalos inar
SFX Ì iñar íñala iñar
SFX Ì iñar íñalas iñar
SFX Ì iñar íñalo iñar
SFX Ì iñar íñalos iñar
SFX Ì irar írala irar
SFX Ì irar íralas irar
SFX Ì irar íralo irar
SFX Ì irar íralos irar
SFX Ì isar ísala isar
SFX Ì isar ísalas isar
SFX Ì isar ísalo isar
SFX Ì isar ísalos isar
SFX Ì itar ítala itar
SFX Ì itar ítalas itar
SFX Ì itar ítalo itar
SFX Ì itar ítalos itar
SFX Ì itir ítela itir
SFX Ì itir ítelas itir
SFX Ì itir ítelo itir
SFX Ì itir ítelos itir
SFX Ì ivar ívala ivar
SFX Ì ivar ívalas ivar
SFX Ì ivar ívalo ivar
SFX Ì ivar ívalos ivar
SFX Ì ivir ívela ivir
SFX Ì ivir ívelas ivir
SFX Ì ivir ívelo ivir
SFX Ì ivir ívelos ivir
SFX Ì izar ízala izar
SFX Ì izar ízalas izar
SFX Ì izar ízalo izar
SFX Ì izar ízalos izar
SFX Ì obar óbala obar
SFX Ì obar óbalas obar
SFX Ì obar óbalo obar
SFX Ì obar óbalos obar
SFX Ì ocar ócala ocar
SFX Ì ocar ócalas ocar
SFX Ì ocar ócalo ocar
SFX Ì ocar ócalos ocar
SFX Ì ogar ógala ogar
SFX Ì ogar ógalas ogar
SFX Ì ogar ógalo ogar
SFX Ì ogar ógalos ogar
SFX Ì oger ógela oger
SFX Ì oger ógelas oger
SFX Ì oger ógelo oger
SFX Ì oger ógelos oger
SFX Ì ojar ójala ojar
SFX Ì ojar ójalas ojar
SFX Ì ojar ójalo ojar
SFX Ì ojar ójalos ojar
SFX Ì ollar óllala ollar
SFX Ì ollar óllalas ollar
SFX Ì ollar óllalo ollar
SFX Ì ollar óllalos ollar
SFX Ì omar ómala omar
SFX Ì omar ómalas omar
SFX Ì omar ómalo omar
SFX Ì omar ómalos omar
SFX Ì omer ómela omer
SFX Ì omer ómelas omer
SFX Ì omer ómelo omer
SFX Ì omer ómelos omer
SFX Ì onar ónala onar
SFX Ì onar ónalas onar
SFX Ì onar ónalo onar
SFX Ì onar ónalos onar
SFX Ì onder óndela onder
SFX Ì onder óndelas onder
SFX Ì onder óndelo onder
SFX Ì onder óndelos onder
SFX Ì orar órala orar
SFX Ì orar óralas orar
SFX Ì orar óralo orar
SFX Ì orar óralos orar
SFX Ì ornar órnala ornar
SFX Ì ornar órnalas ornar
SFX Ì ornar órnalo ornar
SFX Ì ornar órnalos ornar
SFX Ì ortar órtala ortar
SFX Ì ortar órtalas ortar
SFX Ì ortar órtalo ortar
SFX Ì ortar órtalos ortar
SFX Ì otar ótala otar
SFX Ì otar ótalas otar
SFX Ì otar ótalo otar
SFX Ì otar ótalos otar
SFX Ì ozar ózala ozar
SFX Ì ozar ózalas ozar
SFX Ì ozar ózalo ozar
SFX Ì ozar ózalos ozar
SFX Ì ubrir úbrelas ubrir
SFX Ì ubrir úbrela ubrir
SFX Ì ubrir úbrelos ubrir
SFX Ì ubrir úbrelo ubrir
SFX Ì udar údalas udar
SFX Ì udar údala udar
SFX Ì udar údalos udar
SFX Ì udar údalo udar
SFX Ì ufrir úfrelas ufrir
SFX Ì ufrir úfrela ufrir
SFX Ì ufrir úfrelos ufrir
SFX Ì ufrir úfrelo ufrir
SFX Ì ujar újalas ujar
SFX Ì ujar újala ujar
